sv: Signalvägsteknik: Digital modellering; Hybrid; Fast tillstånd; Tub; Övrigt
lt-LT: Signalo kelio technologija: Skaitmeninis modeliavimas; Hibridinė; Kietojo kūno; Vamzdis; Kita
pl: Technologia ścieżki sygnału: Modelowanie cyfrowe; Hybrydowy; Solid-state; Świetlówka; Inne
ru: Технология сигнального тракта: Цифровое моделирование; Гибридные; Твердотельный; Трубчатый; Другой
tr: Sinyal yolu teknolojisi: Dijital modelleme; Hibrit; Katı hal; Tüp; Diğer
es: Tecnología de ruta de señal: Modelado digital; Híbrido; Estado sólido; Tubo; Otros
th: เทคโนโลยีเส้นทางสัญญาณ: โมเดลดิจิทัล; ไฮบริด; โซลิดสเตต; หลอด; อื่นๆ
zh-TW: 信號路徑技術: 數位建模; 混合; 固體狀態; 管狀; 其他
ja: 信号パス技術: デジタルモデリング; ハイブリッド; ソリッドステート; チューブ; その他
en: Signal path technology: Digital modeling; Hybrid; Solid-state; Tube; Other
it: Tecnologia del percorso del segnale: Modellazione digitale; Ibrido; Stato solido; Tubo; Altro
pt-BR: Tecnologia de caminho de sinal: Modelagem digital; Híbrido; Estado sólido; Tubo; Outro
de: Signalwegtechnologie: Digitale Modellierung; Hybrid; Festkörper; Rohr; Sonstiges
ro-RO: Tehnologie cale semnal: Modelare digitală; Hibrid; Stare solidă; Tub; Altele
el: Τεχνολογία διαδρομής σήματος: Ψηφιακή μοντελοποίηση; Υβριδικό; Στερεάς κατάστασης; Μακαρόνι; Άλλο
da: Signalvej-teknologi: Digital modellering; Hybrid; Fast tilstand; Tube; Andet
vi: Công nghệ đường tín hiệu: Mô hình số; Kết hợp; Thể rắn; Ống; Khác
cs: Technologie signálové cesty: Digitální modelování; Hybridní; Solid-state; Tuba; Jiné
ko: 신호 경로 기술: 디지털 모델링; 하이브리드; 전고체; 튜브; 기타
hr-HR: Tehnologija signalnog puta: Digitalno modeliranje; Hibridni; Solid-state; Cijev; Ostalo
zh-CN: 信号路径技术: 数字建模; 混合; 固态; 管状滑道; 其他
nb: Signalbane teknologi: Digital modellering; Hybrid; Fast form; Slange; Annet
nl: Signaalpad technologie: Digitale modellering; Hybride; Solid-state; Tube; Andere
bg-BG: Технология на сигналния път: Цифрово моделиране; Хибрид; Твърдотелна; Тръба; Други
pt-PT: Tecnologia de caminho de sinal: Modelação digital; Híbrido; Estado sólido; Tubo; Outro
fi: Signaalireitin tekniikka: Digitaalinen mallinnus; Hybridi; Solid-state; Putkilo; Muu
sk-SK: Technológia signálovej cesty: Digitálne modelovanie; Hybridný; Pevný stav; Tuba; Iné
fr: Technologie du chemin du signal: Modélisation numérique; Hybride; État solide; Tube; Autre
sl-SI: Tehnologija signalne poti: Digitalno modeliranje; Hibridni; Polprevodniški; Tuba; Drugo
hu: Jelút-technológia: Digitális modellezés; Hibrid; Szilárdtest; Cső; Egyéb